Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 1. General Provisions

§ 40-14-201.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “Uniform Consumer Credit Code Credit Sales.”

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-101; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes Truth in Lending Act violation which “was not intentional and resulted from bona fide error notwithstanding maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error” within meaning of § 130(c) of Act (15 USC § 1640(c)) 153 ALR Fed 193.

§ 40-14-202.
Scope; license required.

This article applies to consumer credit sales, including home solicitation sales and consumer leases.

Unless a person has first registered with the administrator, no person shall engage in the business of making consumer credit sales or consumer leases.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-102; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-102

; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the (a) designation, and deleted "in addition part 6 applies to consumer related sales" at the end; added (b); and made related changes.

§ 40-14-203.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply to this act and appear in this article as follows:

“Amount financed” — W.S.

40-14-211

;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 2.

“Cash price” — W.S.

40-14-210

;

“Consumer credit sale” — W.S.

40-14-204

;

“Consumer lease” — W.S.

40-14-206

;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 14, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 2.

“Credit service charge” — W.S.

40-14-209

;

“Goods” — W.S. 40-14-205(a);

“Home solicitation sale” — W.S.

40-14-251

;

“Merchandise certificate” — W.S. 40-14-205(b);

“Precomputed” — W.S. 40-14-205(g);

“Revolving charge account” — W.S.

40-14-208

;

“Sale of goods” — W.S. 40-14-205(d);

“Sale of an interest in land” — W.S. 40-14-205(f);

“Sale of services” — W.S. 40-14-205(e);

“Seller” — W.S.

40-14-207

;

“Services” — W.S. 40-14-205(c).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-103; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-103

; Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 2; 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed (a)(ii) which defined “annual percentage rate,” and (a)(vii) which defined “corresponding nominal annual percentage rate.”

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a)(vi), which read, "'Consumer related sale' — W.S.

40-14-257

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-204.
Definition of “consumer credit sale.”

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, “consumer credit sale” is a sale of goods, services or an interest in land in which:

Credit is granted by a person who regularly engages as a seller in credit transactions of the same kind;

The buyer is a person other than an organization;

The goods, services or interest in land are purchased primarily for a personal, family or household purpose;

Either the debt is payable in installments or a credit service charge is made; and

With respect to a sale of goods or services, the amount financed does not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00).

Unless the sale is made subject to this act by agreement pursuant to W.S.

40-14-256

, “consumer credit sale” does not include:

A sale in which the seller allows the buyer to purchase goods or services pursuant to a lender credit card or similar arrangement; or

A sale of an interest in land if the credit service charge does not exceed eighteen percent (18%) per year calculated according to the actuarial method on the unpaid balances of the amount financed on the assumption that the debt will be paid according to the agreed terms and will not be paid before the end of the agreed term, except as provided for disclosure and debtors’ remedies in W.S.

40-14-520

.

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 2.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-104; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-104

; Laws 1975, ch. 167, § 1; 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 1981, ch. 147, § 1, 2; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “secured by a dwelling, as defined in W.S. 40-14-640(a)(iv), located in Wyoming” for “secured by personal property used or expected to be used as the principal dwelling of the buyer” in (a)(v).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) in (a)(v).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "or the debt is secured by a dwelling, as defined in W.S. 40-14-640(a)(iv), located in Wyoming" at the end of (a)(v).

Default charge distinguished from credit service charge. —

Permitting debtors to defer payment of their accounts if they paid a late charge was not an extension of credit under the Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code (WUCCC), and the charge imposed was a default charge, not a credit service charge. Iberlin v. TCI Cablevision, 855 P.2d 716,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1993).

Delay in making payment not credit extension. —

If a delay in making payment is permitted until the completion of the services furnished, the creditor is affording a benefit to the debtor for which the debtor is delaying, even temporarily, full payment. That arrangement is not an extension of credit so long as payment is required upon completion of the services and no extension of credit occurs when the creditor requires payment in full before any services are furnished. Iberlin v. TCI Cablevision, 855 P.2d 716,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1993).

“Credit sale” not to include arrangers. —

While the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act extends the definition of “credit sale” to “arrangers,” this section does not. Stevens v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 577 P.2d 1374,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1978).

Applied

in

Vogel v. Onyx Acceptance Corp., 2011 WY 163, 267 P.3d 1057,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Dec. 19, 2011).

Cited

in

Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lease with option to purchase agreement as credit sale or consumer lease under definitions in Truth in Lending Act (15 USC §§ 1602(g), 1667(1)) and applicable regulations, 58 ALR Fed 929.

§ 40-14-205.
Additional definitions.

“Goods” includes a goods not in existence at the time the transaction is entered into and merchandise certificates, but excludes money, chattel paper, documents of title, and instruments.

“Merchandise certificate” means a writing issued by a seller not redeemable in cash and usable in its face amount in lieu of cash in exchange for goods or services.

“Services” includes:

Work, labor, and other personal services;

Privileges with respect to transportation, hotel and restaurant accommodations, education, entertainment, recreation, physical culture, hospital accommodations, funerals, cemetery accommodations, and the like; and

Insurance provided by a person other than the insurer.

“Sale of goods” includes any agreement in the form of a bailment or lease of goods if the bailee or lessee agrees to pay as compensation for use a sum substantially equivalent to or in excess of the aggregate value of the goods involved and it is agreed that the bailee or lessee will become, or for no other or a nominal consideration has the option to become, the owner of the goods upon full compliance with his obligations under the agreement.

“Sale of services” means furnishing or agreeing to furnish services and includes making arrangements to have services furnished by another.

“Sale of an interest in land” includes a lease in which the lessee has an option to purchase the interest and all or a substantial part of the rental or other payments previously made by him are applied to the purchase price.

A sale, refinancing, or consolidation is “precomputed” if the debt is expressed as a sum comprising the amount financed and the amount of the credit service charge computed in advance.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-105; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-105

.

§ 40-14-206.
Definition of “consumer lease”.

“Consumer lease” means a lease of goods:

Which a lessor regularly engaged in the business of leasing makes to a person, other than an organization, who takes under the lease primarily for a personal, family or household purpose;

In which the amount payable under the lease does not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00); and

Which is for a term exceeding four (4) months.

“Consumer lease” does not include a lease made pursuant to a lender credit card or similar arrangement.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-106; W.S. 1957; §

40-2-106

; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) in (a)(ii).

Cited

in

Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lease with option to purchase agreement as credit sale or consumer lease under definitions in Truth in Lending Act (15 USC §§ 1602(g), 1667(1)) and applicable regulations, 58 ALR Fed 929.

§ 40-14-207.
Definition of “seller”.

Except as otherwise provided, “seller” includes an assignee of the seller’s right to payment but use of the term does not in itself impose on an assignee any obligation of the seller with respect to events occurring before the assignment.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-107; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-107

.

No violation of Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code. —

Company did not violate the Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code in charging fees to consumers who opted to make payments on their consumer credit contracts by phone or internet; they were not credit service charges, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

40-14-102

, and they were not imposed as an incident to the extension of credit, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

40-14-207

.
Vogel v. Onyx Acceptance Corp., 2011 WY 163, 267 P.3d 1057,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 40-14-208.
Definition of “revolving charge account”.

“Revolving charge account” means an arrangement between a seller and a buyer pursuant to which:

The seller may permit the buyer to purchase goods or services on credit either from the seller or pursuant to a seller credit card;

The unpaid balances of amounts financed arising from purchases and the credit service and other appropriate charges are debited to an account;

A credit service charge if made is not precomputed but is computed on the outstanding unpaid balances of the buyer’s account from time to time; and

Either the buyer has the privilege of paying in full or in installments or the seller periodically imposes charges computed on the account for delaying payment and permits the buyer to continue to purchase on credit.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-108; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-108

; Laws 1982, ch. 29, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to applicability of chapter to sales made pursuant to a revolving charge account, see §

40-14-120

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-209.
Definition of “credit service charge”.

“Credit service charge” means the sum of:

All charges payable directly or indirectly by the buyer and imposed directly or indirectly by the seller as a condition of or an incident to the extension of credit, including any of the following types of charges which are applicable: time price differential, service, carrying or other charge however denominated, premium or other charge for any guarantee or insurance protecting the seller against the buyer’s default or other credit loss; and

Charges incurred for investigating the collateral or credit-worthiness of the buyer or for commissions or brokerage for obtaining the credit, irrespective of the person to whom the charges are paid or payable, unless the seller had no notice of the charges when the credit was granted.

Credit service charge does not include:

Charges as a result of default;

Additional charges pursuant to W.S.

40-14-213

;

Delinquency charges specified by W.S.

40-14-214

;

Deferral charges pursuant to W.S.

40-14-215

;

A discount not in excess of five percent (5%) offered by a seller for purposes of inducing payment by cash, check or other means not involving the use of a seller or lender credit card, if the discount is offered to all prospective buyers and its availability is disclosed clearly and conspicuously in accordance with the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, P.L. 90-321, 82 Stat. 146, 15 U.S.C. § 470 et seq.; or

Reasonable credit application fees whether or not credit is extended.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-109; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-109

; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 1982, ch. 29, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2008 amendment,

made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “a condition of or” following “the seller as” in (a)(i); and substituted “the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, P.L. 90-321, 82 Stat. 146, 15 U.S.C. § 470 et seq.” for “regulations of the administrator” in (b)(v).

Distinguished from default charge. —

Permitting debtors to defer payment of their accounts if they paid a late charge was not an extension of credit under the Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code (WUCCC), and the charge imposed was a default charge, not a credit service charge. Iberlin v. TCI Cablevision, 855 P.2d 716,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1993).

A late payment charge is not a credit service charge

so long as it does not take on the character of interest, which the term “credit service charge” implicates. The proper procedure is to utilize the late payment fee to insure prompt payment and pursue strict procedures to collect debts that are past due. Iberlin v. TCI Cablevision, 855 P.2d 716,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1993).

Delay in making payment not credit service charge. —

If a delay in making payment is permitted until the completion of the services furnished, the creditor is affording a benefit to the debtor for which the debtor is delaying, even temporarily, full payment. That arrangement is not an extension of credit so long as payment is required upon completion of the services and no extension of credit occurs when the creditor requires payment in full before any services are furnished. Iberlin v. TCI Cablevision, 855 P.2d 716,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1993).

Late payment charge within exception. —

Without evidence that a business anticipates that a particular customer will not pay his bill when due and, therefore, assesses a credit service charge in the guise of a late payment charge, a late payment charge comes within the exception in the WUCCC for an actual unanticipated late payment. Iberlin v. TCI Cablevision, 855 P.2d 716,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1993).

Applied

in

Vogel v. Onyx Acceptance Corp., 2011 WY 163, 267 P.3d 1057,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Dec. 19, 2011).

§ 40-14-210.
Definition of “cash price”.

“Cash price” means the price at which the creditor offers, in the ordinary course of business, to sell for cash the property or services which are the subject of a consumer credit transaction. It may include the cash price of accessories or services related to the sale such as delivery, installation, alterations, modifications, and improvements, and may include taxes to the extent imposed on the cash sale, but shall not include any other charges of the types described in section 1026.4 of regulation Z of the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-110; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-110

; 2013 ch. 150, Laws 2013, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “section 1026.4” for “section 226.4” in the definition of “cash price.”

§ 40-14-211.
Definition of “amount financed”.

“Amount financed” means the total of the following items to the extent that payment is deferred:

The cash price of the goods, services, or interest in land, less the amount of any down payment whether made in cash or in property traded in;

The amount actually paid or to be paid by the seller pursuant to an agreement with the buyer to discharge a security interest in or a lien on property traded in; and

If not included in the cash price:

Any applicable sales, use, excise, or documentary stamp taxes;

Amounts actually paid or to be paid by the seller for registration, certificate of title, or license fees; and

Additional charges permitted by W.S.

40-14-213

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-111; W.S. 1957, §

40-2-111

; Laws 2012, ch. 98, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

40-14-213

” for “this article (section 2-202)” in (a)(iii)(C).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.